Hawaii statutes.
§291C-196 Driving mopeds on roadways.
(a) Every person driving a moped, except a three-wheeled moped, upon a roadway
at a speed less than the normal speed of traffic moving in the same direction
at such time shall ride as near to the right side of the roadway as
practicable, exercising due care when passing a standing vehicle or one
proceeding in the same direction, except under any of the following situations:

(1) When preparing for a left turn at an intersection
or into a private road or driveway, except where prohibited by official
traffic-control devices;

(2) When reasonably necessary to avoid conditions
(including, but not limited to fixed or moving objects, vehicles, bicycles,
pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or substandard width lanes) that make it
unsafe to continue along the right-hand curb or edge; and

(3) When a roadway is designated and signposted to
carry traffic in one direction only and has two or more marked traffic lanes, a
person operating a moped may ride as near to the left-hand side of the roadway
as practicable.

(b) Persons driving mopeds upon a roadway
shall drive in single file.

(c) No person shall drive a moped on any
sidewalk or area intended for use as a sidewalk, nor shall any person drive a
moped on any path or other area intended for the exclusive use of pedestrians.

(d) A three-wheeled moped shall be restricted
to traveling on roadways with a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles per
hour or less. [L 1978, c 175, pt of §15; am L 1982, c 38, §1; am L 2008, c 197,
§2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next